District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

42-3151.09

Condemnation and acquisition of open, hazardous residential buildings or other structures

Repealed.

History

Apr. 27, 2001, D.C. Law 13-281, §§ 401-413, 48 DCR 1888
Apr. 19, 2002, D.C. Law 14-114, § 103, 49 DCR 1468

Editor's Notes

Section 601 of D.C. Law 13-281 provided: “The Mayor may issue rules to implement the Abatement and Condemnation of Nuisance Properties Omnibus Amendment Act of 2000 in accordance with the District of Columbia Administrative Procedure Act.”

Mayor's Orders

Delegation of Authority Under the Anti-Graffiti Emergency Act of 2010, see Mayor’s Order 2010-139, August 20, 2010 ( 57 DCR 7740).

Delegation of Authority Under the Anti Graffiti Act of 2010, see Mayor’s Order 2010-176, November 26, 2010 ( 57 DCR 11421).